Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB290.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 27 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 43POLYSTYRENE FOOD CONTAINER PROHIBITIONSec.4301. Purpose.4302. Definitions.4303. Prohibition.4304. Complaints.4305. Compliance.4306. Regulations.1234567891011121314151617 4307. Penalties.4308. Applicability.§ 4301. Purpose.The intent of this chapter is to reduce the adverse environmental impact of polystyrene food containers by prohibiting a food establishment from dispensing prepared food to a customer in a polystyrene food service container.§ 4302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Food establishment." All sales outlets, stores, shops or other places of business located within this Commonwealth which operate primarily to sell or convey food directly to the ultimate consumer, which food is predominately contained, wrapped or held in or on packaging. The term shall include any place where food is prepared, mixed, cooked, baked, smoked, preserved, bottled, packaged, handled, stored, manufactured and sold or offered for sale, including any fixed or mobile restaurant, drive-in, coffee shop, cafeteria, short order cafe, delicatessen, luncheonette, grill, sandwich shop, soda fountain, tavern, bar, cocktail lounge, nightclub, roadside stand, prepared food take-out place, industrial feeding establishment, catering kitchen, commissary, grocery store, public food market, food stand or similar place in which food or drink is prepared for sale or for service on the premises or elsewhere, and any other establishment or operation, including homes, where food is processed, prepared, stored, served or provided for the public 20250HB0290PN0235 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for charge."Polystyrene food service container." As follows:(1) A single-use polystyrene foam food service container, including a cup, bowl, plate and clamshell-style container or a foam cooler that is not encased in another material.(2) A single-use polystyrene solid plastic food container, including a cup, bowl, plate, clamshell-style container, cutlery, straw and cup lid."Prepared food." Food or beverage prepared for public consumption by a food establishment using any cooking or food preparation technique. The term does not include raw or uncooked meat, fish or eggs provided for public consumption without further food preparation . "Retailer." A person that purchases or receives products from any source for the purpose of sale to a consumer.§ 4303. Prohibition.(a) Food establishment.--A food establishment is prohibited from:(1) Dispensing prepared food in or on a polystyrene food service container.(2) Selling, giving or providing eating utensils or straws composed of polystyrene.(b) Retailer.--A retailer is prohibited from selling, giving or providing a polystyrene food service container except for:(1) Meat trays.(2) Egg cartons.(3) Packing materials.§ 4304. Complaints.The department shall prescribe a procedure for a person to 20250HB0290PN0235 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 file a complaint with the department for a violation of this chapter.§ 4305. Compliance.The department shall develop and maintain a publicly accessible Internet website with all of the following:(1) A description of the information necessary to comply with the prohibition under section 4303 (relating to prohibition).(2) A description of the procedure to file a complaint with the department for a violation of the prohibition under section 4304 (relating to complaints).§ 4306. Regulations.The department may adopt rules and promulgate regulations necessary to implement this chapter.§ 4307. Penalties.(a) Imposition.--The department may impose a civil penalty in the following amounts for a violation of this chapter:(1) For a first violation, $500.(2) For a second violation, $1,000.(3) For a third or subsequent violation, $2,000.(b) Payment.--Any civil penalty collected under subsection (a) shall be paid to the department.(c) Local law.--This chapter shall preempt any ordinance or resolution passed or adopted by any political subdivision that is effective before, on or after the effective date of this subsection to the extent that the ordinance or resolution conflicts or is inconsistent with this chapter.§ 4308. Applicability.This act shall apply to transactions consummated after July 1, 2025.20250HB0290PN0235 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0290PN0235 - 5 - 1